Utah statutes.
31A-22-612.   Conversion privileges for insured former spouse.

(1)  An accident and health insurance policy, which in addition to covering the insured also provides coverage to the spouse of the insured, may not contain a provision for termination of coverage of a spouse covered under the policy, except by entry of a valid decree of divorce or annulment between the parties.

(2)  Every policy which contains this type of provision shall provide that upon the entry of the divorce decree the spouse is entitled to have issued an individual policy of accident and health insurance without evidence of insurability, upon application to the company and payment of the appropriate premium.  The policy shall provide the coverage being issued which is most nearly similar to the terminated coverage.  Probationary or waiting periods in the policy are considered satisfied to the extent the coverage was in force under the prior policy.

(3)  When the insurer receives actual notice that the coverage of a spouse is to be terminated because of a divorce or annulment, the insurer shall promptly provide the spouse written notification of the right to obtain individual coverage as provided in Subsection (2), the premium amounts required, and the manner, place, and time in which premiums may be paid.  The premium is determined in accordance with the insurer's table of premium rates applicable to the age and class of risk of the persons to be covered and to the type and amount of coverage provided.  If the spouse applies and tenders the first monthly premium to the insurer within 30 days after receiving the notice provided by this subsection, the spouse shall receive individual coverage that commences immediately upon termination of coverage under the insured's policy.

(4)  This section does not apply to accident and health insurance policies offered on a group blanket basis.



Amended by Chapter 319, 2013 General Session

